Maryland, session 2026, SB0198.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
16–420.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “BOARD” MEANS THE BOARD OF COMMUNITY COLLEGE
TRUSTEES FOR PRINCE GEORGE’S COUNTY.
(3) “PROGRAM” MEANS THE AEROSPACE TECHNOLOGY STUDIES
PROGRAM.
(B) THE BOARD, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE COMMISSION, THE
DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE, AND THE PRINCE GEORGE’S COUNTY ECONOMIC
DEVELOPMENT CORPORATION, SHALL ESTABLISH AN AEROSPACE TECHNOLOGY
STUDIES PROGRAM.
– 1 –

Ch. 784 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(C) (1) THE BOARD, IN CONSULTATION WITH INDUSTRY EXPERTS, SHALL
DEVELOP THE PROGRAM CURRICULUM TO INCLUDE:
(I) AEROSPACE SYSTEMS TECHNOLOGY;
(II) AVIONICS AND ELECTRONICS;
(III) ADVANCED MANUFACTURING; AND
(IV) ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE IN AEROSPACE.
(2) THE PROGRAM SHALL PROVIDE:
(I) WORKFORCE–BASED LEARNING, INCLUDING INTERNSHIPS
AND APPRENTICESHIPS; AND
(II) A PATHWAY FROM HIGH SCHOOL TO COLLEGE AND
CAREERS FOR INDIVIDUALS WITH AN INTEREST IN PURSUING A CAREER IN
AEROSPACE TECHNOLOGY.
(D) THE BOARD SHALL ENTER INTO MEMORANDA OF UNDERSTANDING TO
ESTABLISH FORMAL INDUSTRY PARTNERSHIPS WITH AT LEAST ONE AEROSPACE
AND TECHNOLOGY EMPLOYER IN PRINCE GEORGE’S COUNTY.
(E) THE ESTABLISHMENT OF THE PROGRAM AT PRINCE GEORGE’S
COMMUNITY COLLEGE IS SUBJECT TO PROGRAM APPROVAL BY THE COMMISSION
UNDER TITLE 11, SUBTITLE 2 OF THIS ARTICLE.
(F) (1) ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 15, 2026, AND EACH DECEMBER 15
THEREAFTER UNTIL THE PROGRAM HAS BEEN ESTABLISHED, THE BOARD SHALL
SUBMIT A REPORT TO THE COMMISSION, THE PRINCE GEORGE’S COUNTY
EXECUTIVE, THE MARYLAND AEROSPACE TECHNOLOGY COMMISSION, AND, IN
ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, THE GENERAL
ASSEMBLY ON THE STATUS OF ESTABLISHING THE PROGRAM.
(2) ON OR BEFORE OCTOBER 1 OF EACH YEAR AFTER THE
PROGRAM’S ESTABLISHMENT, THE BOARD SHALL SUBMIT A REPORT TO THE
COMMISSION, THE PRINCE GEORGE’S COUNTY EXECUTIVE, THE MARYLAND
AEROSPACE TECHNOLOGY COMMISSION, AND, IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF
THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY ON INDUSTRY
PLACEMENT AND OUTCOMES OF THE PROGRAM IN THE IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING
ACADEMIC YEAR.
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 784
(a) Prince George’s Community College shall conduct a comprehensive feasibility
study and program design assessment to establish an aerospace systems technology
workforce training program and an aviation systems technology workforce training
program.
(b) The study shall include an examination of:
(1) the workforce demand for aerospace manufacturing, aerospace systems
technology, and aviation systems technology regionally and statewide;
(2) the current and projected needs of private sector employers engaged in
aerospace, aviation, engineering, defense, and advanced manufacturing in Prince George’s
County and the State;
(3) the appropriate associate degree, credit certificate, and noncredit
workforce credential structures that are aligned with high–value industry degrees,
certificates, and credentials;
(4) opportunities for stackable credentials that are eligible for federal or
State financial aid;
(5) the facilities, laboratories, simulators, equipment, and infrastructure
that are required to deliver the programs;
(6) faculty and instructor credential and certification requirements,
including recruitment and workforce development needs;
(7) apprenticeship, internship, and other work–based learning
opportunities with private sector employers;
(8) start–up costs, operating costs, and any long–term sustainability
considerations; and
(9) the recommended sequencing for program implementation.
(c) In conducting the study, Prince George’s Community College shall consult
with:
(1) private sector employers in aerospace, aviation, engineering, defense,
and advanced manufacturing;
(2) the Maryland Aerospace and Technology Commission under the
Department of Commerce;
(3) State and regional workforce development entities;
– 3 –

Ch. 784 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(4) the Maryland Department of Labor; and
(5) other economic development or industry stakeholders, as appropriate.
(d) The study shall include structured industry engagement, including employer
roundtables, workforce charrettes, and demand–validation sessions to ensure alignment
with current and projected labor markets.
(e) On or before December 1, 2027, Prince George’s Community College shall
report to the Senate Education, Energy, and the Environment Committee and the House
Ways and Means Committee, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article,
on:
(1) the findings of the workforce demand analysis;
(2) recommended models for degree, certificate, and noncredit workforce
credential programs;
(3) the investments that would be required for facilities, laboratories,
simulators, equipment, and infrastructure;
(4) faculty and staff plans;
(5) potential industry partnerships;
(6) a proposed implementation timeline; and
(7) a funding and sustainability plan.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, for fiscal year 2028, the
Governor shall include in the annual budget bill an appropriation of $100,000 to Prince
George’s Community College to complete the feasibility study and program design
assessment required under Section 1 of this Act, including for industry workforce analysis,
technical program design consulting, employer engagement, curriculum framework
development, and planning for facilities, laboratories, simulators, equipment, and
infrastructure investment.
SECTION 2. 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
July 1, 2026. It shall remain effective for a period of 2 years and, at the end of June 30,
2028, this Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly, shall be abrogated
and of no further force and effect.
Approved by the Governor, May 26, 2026.
– 4 –